bg-BG: Съвместим накрайник на острието: Хибриден; Стандартен; Заострен; Друго
fi: Yhteensopiva lavan liitoskohta: Hybridi; Vakio; Kavennettu; Muu
th: ส่วนหัวใบมีดที่เข้ากันได้: ไฮบริด; มาตรฐาน; เทเปอร์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilan hosel za oštricu: Hibridni; Standardni; Suženi; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibel bladhosel: Hybrid; Standard; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
vi: Cổ gậy gạt tương thích: Hybrid; Tiêu chuẩn; Thon dần; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamas mentės kaklelis: Hibridinis; Standartinis; Siaurėjantis; Kita
ja: 対応ブレードホーゼル: ハイブリッド; スタンダード; テーパード; その他
nb: Kompatibelt hoselblad: Hybrid; Standard; Konisk; Annet
fr: Emboîture de lame compatible: Hybride; Standard; Conique; Autre
pt-PT: Hosel da lâmina compatível: Híbrido; Padrão; Cónico; Outro
pt-BR: Hosel de lâmina compatível: Híbrido; Padrão; Cônico; Outro
zh-TW: 相容刀片插鞘: 混合式; 標準; 漸細式; 其他
ko: 호환 블레이드 호젤: 하이브리드; 표준; 테이퍼드; 기타
en: Compatible blade hosel: Hybrid; Standard; Tapered; Other
ro-RO: Hosel de lamă compatibil: Hibrid; Standard; Conic; Altele
it: Calice della lama compatibile: Ibrido; Standard; Affusolato; Altro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný krčok golfovej hlavy typu blade: Hybridné; Štandardné; Zúžené; Iné
es: Hosel de hoja compatible: Híbrido; Estándar; Cónico; Otro
tr: Uyumlu hosel tipi: Hibrit; Standart; Konik; Diğer
el: Συμβατός λαιμός λεπίδας: Υβριδικό; Τυπικό; Κωνικό; Άλλο
da: Kompatibel hosel til enden: Hybrid; Standard; Konisk; Andet
ru: Совместимая шейка лезвия: Гибридный; Стандартный; Зауженный; Другое
sl-SI: Združljiv nosilec za glavo: Hibridno; Standardno; Koničasto; Drugo
pl: Zgodna szyjka ostrza: Hybrydowy; Standardowy; Zwężany; Inny
hu: Kompatibilis ütőfej nyak: Hibrid; Standard; Szűkülő; Egyéb
nl: Compatibel blade-hosel: Hybride; Standaard; Taps toelopend; Overige
de: Kompatibles Schlägerdesign: Hybrid; Standard; Konisch; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní krček čepele: Hybridní; Standardní; Kónický; Ostatní
zh-CN: 适用杆头插口: 混合型; 标准; 锥形; 其他